Utah statutes.
57-14-1.   Legislative purpose.

This chapter's purpose is to limit the liability of public and private land owners toward a person entering the owner's land as a trespasser or for recreational purposes, whether by permission or by operation of Title 73, Chapter 29, Public Waters Access Act.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 410, 2010 General Session

